District of Columbia statutes.
3-512.02

Repealed

Issuance of animal license; collection of fees.

Repealed.

Mar. 9, 1983, D.C. Law 4-171, § 13b
as added Dec. 5, 2008, D.C. Law 17-281, § 101(b), 55 DCR 9186
Mar. 26, 2014, D.C. Law 20-96, § 401(a), 61 DCR 1184